Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-415
Survey record repository; funding; fees.

No expense for developing or maintaining the survey record repository shall be paid for by funds from the General Fund. The fees for records, searches, and other services related to the repository's files shall be set so that all costs of the survey record repository are paid by the persons requesting such records, searches, or other services.

Laws 1982, LB 127, § 18.